Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.290

Legislative—Initiative petition—Appeal to court.

If the clerk finds the petition insufficient or if the commission refuses either to pass an initiative ordinance or order an election thereon, any taxpayer may commence an action in the superior court against the city and procure a decree ordering an election to be held in the city for the purpose of voting upon the proposed ordinance if the court finds the petition to be sufficient.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.290. Prior: (i) 1911 c 116 s 20, part; RRS s 9109, part. (ii) 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]